Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
CHAPTER 204 Poor Persons and Poorhouses [Repealed]

204.010.
Fiscal courts to provide for poor persons. [Repealed.]

204.020.
Fiscal court may acquire land and establish a poorhouse. [Repealed.]

204.030.
Appointment of commissioners and receivers. [Repealed.]

204.040.
Duties of receiver — Bond — Report. [Repealed.]

204.050.
Commitment to poorhouse — Medical aid for poor persons. [Repealed.]

204.060.
Beggars — Disposition of. [Repealed.]

204.070.
Feebleminded persons not to be kept in poorhouse. [Repealed.]

204.080.
Counties may contract for establishment and operation of joint poorhouse or poor farm — Acquisition and disposition of property — Title. [Repealed.]

204.090.
Apportionment of cost of joint project. [Repealed.]

204.100.
Board of trustees — Membership — Appointment — Terms — Vacancies — Chairman — Meetings — Compensation. [Repealed.]

204.110.
Powers of board of trustees. [Repealed.]

204.120.
Tax for support of joint project — Issuance of revenue bonds. [Repealed.]

204.130.
Period of contract — Withdrawal. [Repealed.]

204.140.
Powers of counties. [Repealed.]

204.200.
Certain cities and counties may contribute to private agencies performing charitable and welfare work. [Repealed.]

204.210.
Certain cities and counties may create joint or separate agencies to supervise welfare activities. [Repealed.]